Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.050

Surplus school property, rental, lease, or use of—Joint use—Compensation—Conditions generally.

(1) Authorization to rent, lease, or permit the occasional use of surplus school property under RCW 28A.335.040 may include the joint use of school district property, which is in part used for school purposes, by any combination of persons, corporations or government entities for other than common school purposes: PROVIDED, That any such joint use shall comply with existing local zoning ordinances.

(2) Authorization to rent, lease, or permit the occasional use of surplus school property under RCW 28A.335.040 shall be conditioned on the payment by all users, lessees or tenants, assessed on a basis that is nondiscriminatory within classes of users, of such reasonable compensation and under such terms as regulations adopted by the board of directors shall provide.

(3) Nothing in RCW 28A.335.040 and 28A.335.090 shall prohibit a school board of directors and a lessee or tenant from agreeing to conditions to the lease otherwise lawful, including conditions of reimbursement or partial reimbursement of costs associated with the lease or rental of the property.

[ 1990 c 33 s 355; 1980 c 115 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.58.034.]

NOTES:

Severability—1980 c 115: See note following RCW 28A.335.090.